Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201577-1409
State Treasurer; rules and regulations; powers.

The State Treasurer may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, enter into contracts and agreements, charge fees and expenses to the funds held under the program or to persons establishing or owning accounts, make reports, retain designated administrators, employees, experts, and consultants, and do all other things necessary or convenient to implement sections 77-1401 to 77-1409.

Laws 2015, LB591, § 9.
May 28, 2015